Hawaii, session 2026, GM1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
1 SECTION 1. Section 121-45, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
3 "(a) The adjutant general, subject to the availability of
4 funds, may award tuition assistance to qualified enlisted
5 persons, warrant officers, and company grade officers (0-1
6 through 0-3) in the Hawaii national guard who are:
7 (1) Residents of the State, as defined by the board of
regents pursuant to section [-{-] 304A-402 [+] ; and
8
9 (2) Undergraduate and graduate students working toward a
10 degree on any campus of the university of
11 Hawaii."
12 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
13 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
14 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2459 SB2138 CDl SMA.docx 1
niwiiiiMniiHiiiiiiniiiH

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 29th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 2138, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
98-26

SB No. 2138, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives